Utah statutes.
13-22-11.   Expiration of registration and permits.
(1)  Each charitable organization registration issued under this chapter
expires annually on the earlier of January 1, April 1, July 1, or October 1
following the completion of 12 months after the date of initial issuance.
(2)  Each professional fund raiser's permit issued under this chapter expires
the earlier of:
(a)  annually on the date of issuance; or
(b) when the professional fund raiser ceases affiliation with the charitable
organization named in the application for permit.
(3)  Each professional fund raising counsel's or consultant's permit issued
under this chapter expires the earlier of:
(a)  annually on the date of issuance; or
(b)  when the professional fundraising counsel or consultant ceases
affiliation with the charitable organization named in the application for
permit.
(4)  A registration or permit may be renewed only by complying with the
requirements for obtaining the original registration or permit.
